algorithm/arabic.sbl
/*
 * Author:
 * - Assem Chelli, < assem [dot] ch [at] gmail > *
*/
groupings ()
stringescapes { }

/* the Arabic letters in Unicode */
// Hamza
stringdef o     '{U+0621}' // Hamza
stringdef ao    '{U+0623}' // Hamza above Alef
stringdef ao_   '{U+0625}' // Hamza below Alef
stringdef a~    '{U+0622}' // Alef madda
stringdef wo    '{U+0624}' // Hamza above waw
stringdef yo    '{U+0626}' // Hamza above yeh

// Letters
stringdef a     '{U+0627}' // Alef
stringdef a_    '{U+0649}' // Alef Maksura
stringdef b     '{U+0628}' // Beh
stringdef t_    '{U+0629}' // Teh_Marbuta
stringdef t     '{U+062A}' // Teh
stringdef th    '{U+062B}' // Theh
stringdef j     '{U+062C}' // Jeem
stringdef h     '{U+062D}' // Hah
stringdef x     '{U+062E}' // Khah
stringdef d     '{U+062F}' // Dal
stringdef dz    '{U+0630}' // Thal
stringdef r     '{U+0631}' // Reh
stringdef z     '{U+0632}' // Zain
stringdef s     '{U+0633}' // Seen
stringdef sh    '{U+0634}' // Sheen
stringdef c     '{U+0635}' // Sad
stringdef dh    '{U+0636}' // Dad
stringdef tt    '{U+0637}' // Tah
stringdef zh    '{U+0638}' // Zah
stringdef i     '{U+0639}' // Ain
stringdef gh    '{U+063A}' // Ghain
stringdef f     '{U+0641}' // Feh
stringdef q     '{U+0642}' // Qaf
stringdef k     '{U+0643}' // Kaf
stringdef l     '{U+0644}' // Lam
stringdef m     '{U+0645}' // Meem
stringdef n     '{U+0646}' // Noon
stringdef e     '{U+0647}' // Heh
stringdef w     '{U+0648}' // Waw
stringdef y     '{U+064A}' // Yeh

// Diacritics
stringdef aan   '{U+064B}' // FatHatan
stringdef uun   '{U+064C}' // Dammatan
stringdef iin   '{U+064D}' // Kasratan
stringdef aa    '{U+064E}' // FatHa
stringdef uu    '{U+064F}' // Damma
stringdef ii    '{U+0650}' // Kasra
stringdef oo    '{U+0652}' // Sukun
stringdef ~     '{U+0651}' // Shadda

// Hindu–Arabic numerals
stringdef 0     '{U+0660}'
stringdef 1     '{U+0661}'
stringdef 2     '{U+0662}'
stringdef 3     '{U+0663}'
stringdef 4     '{U+0664}'
stringdef 5     '{U+0665}'
stringdef 6     '{U+0666}'
stringdef 7     '{U+0667}'
stringdef 8     '{U+0668}'
stringdef 9     '{U+0669}'
stringdef %     hex '066a'  // PERCENT
stringdef .     hex '066b'  // DECIMAL
stringdef '     hex '066c'  // THOUSANDS

// Kasheeda
stringdef _     '{U+0640}' // Kasheeda, Tatweel

// Ponctuation marks
stringdef ,   hex '060C' // COMMA
stringdef ;   hex '061B' // SEMICOLON
stringdef ?   hex '061F' // QUESTION

// Shaped forms
stringdef o1     '{U+FE80}'  // HAMZA
stringdef ao1    '{U+FE83}'  // ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
stringdef ao2    '{U+FE84}'  // ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
stringdef ao_1   '{U+FE87}'  // ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
stringdef ao_2   '{U+FE88}'  // ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
stringdef yo1    '{U+FE8B}'  // YEH_HAMZA
stringdef yo2    '{U+FE8C}'  // YEH_HAMZA
stringdef yo3    '{U+FE89}'  // YEH_HAMZA
stringdef yo4    '{U+FE8A}'  // YEH_HAMZA
stringdef a~1    '{U+FE81}'  // ALEF_MADDA
stringdef a~2    '{U+FE82}'  // ALEF_MADDA
stringdef wo1    '{U+FE85}'  // WAW_HAMZA
stringdef wo2    '{U+FE86}'  // WAW_HAMZA
stringdef a1     '{U+FE8D}'  // ALEF
stringdef a2     '{U+FE8E}'  // ALEF
stringdef b1     '{U+FE8F}'  // BEH
stringdef b2     '{U+FE90}'  // BEH
stringdef b3     '{U+FE91}'  // BEH
stringdef b4     '{U+FE92}'  // BEH
stringdef t_1    '{U+FE93}'  // TEH_MARBUTA
stringdef t_2    '{U+FE94}'  // TEH_MARBUTA
stringdef t1     '{U+FE97}'  // TEH
stringdef t2     '{U+FE98}'  // TEH
stringdef t3     '{U+FE95}'  // TEH
stringdef t4     '{U+FE96}'  // TEH
stringdef th1    '{U+FE9B}'  // THEH
stringdef th2    '{U+FE9C}'  // THEH
stringdef th3    '{U+FE9A}'  // THEH
stringdef th4    '{U+FE99}'  // THEH
stringdef j1     '{U+FE9F}'  // JEEM
stringdef j2     '{U+FEA0}'  // JEEM
stringdef j3     '{U+FE9D}'  // JEEM
stringdef j4     '{U+FE9E}'  // JEEM
stringdef h1     '{U+FEA3}'  // HAH
stringdef h2     '{U+FEA4}'  // HAH
stringdef h3     '{U+FEA1}'  // HAH
stringdef h4     '{U+FEA2}'  // HAH
stringdef x1     '{U+FEA7}'  // KHAH
stringdef x2     '{U+FEA8}'  // KHAH
stringdef x3     '{U+FEA5}'  // KHAH
stringdef x4     '{U+FEA6}'  // KHAH
stringdef d1     '{U+FEA9}'  // DAL
stringdef d2     '{U+FEAA}'  // DAL
stringdef dz1    '{U+FEAB}'  // THAL
stringdef dz2    '{U+FEAC}'  // THAL
stringdef r1     '{U+FEAD}'  // REH
stringdef r2     '{U+FEAE}'  // REH
stringdef z1     '{U+FEAF}'  // ZAIN
stringdef z2     '{U+FEB0}'  // ZAIN
stringdef s1     '{U+FEB3}'  // SEEN
stringdef s2     '{U+FEB4}'  // SEEN
stringdef s3     '{U+FEB1}'  // SEEN
stringdef s4     '{U+FEB2}'  // SEEN
stringdef sh1    '{U+FEB7}'  // SHEEN
stringdef sh2    '{U+FEB8}'  // SHEEN
stringdef sh3    '{U+FEB5}'  // SHEEN
stringdef sh4    '{U+FEB6}'  // SHEEN
stringdef c1     '{U+FEBB}'  // SAD
stringdef c2     '{U+FEBC}'  // SAD
stringdef c3     '{U+FEB9}'  // SAD
stringdef c4     '{U+FEBA}'  // SAD
stringdef dh1    '{U+FEBF}'  // DAD
stringdef dh2    '{U+FEC0}'  // DAD
stringdef dh3    '{U+FEBD}'  // DAD
stringdef dh4    '{U+FEBE}'  // DAD
stringdef tt1    '{U+FEC3}'  // TAH
stringdef tt2    '{U+FEC4}'  // TAH
stringdef tt3    '{U+FEC1}'  // TAH
stringdef tt4    '{U+FEC2}'  // TAH
stringdef zh1    '{U+FEC7}'  // ZAH
stringdef zh2    '{U+FEC8}'  // ZAH
stringdef zh3    '{U+FEC5}'  // ZAH
stringdef zh4    '{U+FEC6}'  // ZAH
stringdef i1     '{U+FECB}'  // AIN
stringdef i2     '{U+FECC}'  // AIN
stringdef i3     '{U+FEC9}'  // AIN
stringdef i4     '{U+FECA}'  // AIN
stringdef gh1    '{U+FECF}'  // GHAIN
stringdef gh2    '{U+FED0}'  // GHAIN
stringdef gh3    '{U+FECD}'  // GHAIN
stringdef gh4    '{U+FECE}'  // GHAIN
stringdef f1     '{U+FED3}'  // FEH
stringdef f2     '{U+FED4}'  // FEH
stringdef f3     '{U+FED1}'  // FEH
stringdef f4     '{U+FED2}'  // FEH
stringdef q1     '{U+FED7}'  // QAF
stringdef q2     '{U+FED8}'  // QAF
stringdef q3     '{U+FED5}'  // QAF
stringdef q4     '{U+FED6}'  // QAF
stringdef k1     '{U+FEDB}'  // KAF
stringdef k2     '{U+FEDC}'  // KAF
stringdef k3     '{U+FED9}'  // KAF
stringdef k4     '{U+FEDA}'  // KAF
stringdef l1     '{U+FEDF}'  // LAM
stringdef l2     '{U+FEE0}'  // LAM
stringdef l3     '{U+FEDD}'  // LAM
stringdef l4     '{U+FEDE}'  // LAM
stringdef m1     '{U+FEE3}'  // MEEM
stringdef m2     '{U+FEE4}'  // MEEM
stringdef m3     '{U+FEE1}'  // MEEM
stringdef m4     '{U+FEE2}'  // MEEM
stringdef n1     '{U+FEE7}'  // NOON
stringdef n2     '{U+FEE8}'  // NOON
stringdef n3     '{U+FEE5}'  // NOON
stringdef n4     '{U+FEE6}'  // NOON
stringdef e1     '{U+FEEB}'  // HEH
stringdef e2     '{U+FEEC}'  // HEH
stringdef e3     '{U+FEE9}'  // HEH
stringdef e4     '{U+FEEA}'  // HEH
stringdef w1     '{U+FEED}'  // WAW
stringdef w2     '{U+FEEE}'  // WAW
stringdef a_1    '{U+FEEF}'  // ALEF_MAKSURA
stringdef a_2    '{U+FEF0}'  // ALEF_MAKSURA
stringdef y1     '{U+FEF3}'  // YEH
stringdef y2     '{U+FEF4}'  // YEH
stringdef y3     '{U+FEF1}'  // YEH
stringdef y4     '{U+FEF2}'  // YEH


// Ligatures Lam-Alef
stringdef la      '{U+FEFB}' // LAM_ALEF
stringdef la2     '{U+FEFC}' // LAM_ALEF
stringdef lao     '{U+FEF7}' // LAM_ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
stringdef lao2    '{U+FEF8}' // LAM_ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
stringdef lao_    '{U+FEF9}' // LAM_ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
stringdef lao_2   '{U+FEFA}' // LAM_ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
stringdef la~     '{U+FEF5}' // LAM_ALEF_MADDA_ABOVE
stringdef la~2    '{U+FEF6}' // LAM_ALEF_MADDA_ABOVE

booleans (
            is_noun
            is_verb
            is_defined
            should_stem
         )

routines (
    Prefix_Step1
    Prefix_Step2a
    Prefix_Step2b
    Prefix_Step3a_Noun
    Prefix_Step3b_Noun
    Prefix_Step3c_Noun
    Prefix_Step3_Verb
    Prefix_Step4_Verb

    Suffix_All_alef_maqsura
    Suffix_Noun_Step1a
    Suffix_Noun_Step1b
    Suffix_Noun_Step2a
    Suffix_Noun_Step2b
    Suffix_Noun_Step2c1
    Suffix_Noun_Step2c2
    Suffix_Noun_Step3
    Suffix_Verb_Step1
    Suffix_Verb_Step2a
    Suffix_Verb_Step2b
    Suffix_Verb_Step2c

    Normalize_post
    Normalize_pre

    Checks1
    Checks2
    Validate
)

externals ( stem )



// Normalizations
define Normalize_pre as (
    do repeat (
        (
            [substring] among (
                '{aan}' '{uun}' '{iin}' '{aa}' '{uu}' '{ii}' '{oo}' '{~}'( delete ) // strip vocalization
                '{_}' ( delete ) // strip kasheeda

                // Ponctuation marks
                '.' ',' ';' ':'  '?' '!' '/' '*' '%' '\' '"' ( delete) // General
                '{,}' '{;}' '{?}'  ( delete ) // Arabic-specific

                // Hindu–Arabic numerals
                '{0}' ( <- '0')
                '{1}' ( <- '1')
                '{2}' ( <- '2')
                '{3}' ( <- '3')
                '{4}' ( <- '4')
                '{5}' ( <- '5')
                '{6}' ( <- '6')
                '{7}' ( <- '7')
                '{8}' ( <- '8')
                '{9}' ( <- '9')
                '{%}' '{.}' '{'}' ( delete )

                // Shaped forms
                '{o1}' ( <- '{o}' ) // HAMZA
                '{ao1}' '{ao2}'  ( <- '{ao}' ) // ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
                '{ao_1}' '{ao_2}' ( <- '{ao_}' ) // ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
                '{yo1}'  '{yo2}' '{yo3}'  '{yo4}'  ( <- '{yo}' ) // YEH_HAMZA
                '{a~1}'  '{a~2}'( <- '{a~}' ) // ALEF_MADDA
                '{wo1}' '{wo2}'( <- '{wo}' ) // WAW_HAMZA
                '{a1}' '{a2}' ( <- '{a}' ) // ALEF
                '{b1}' '{b2}' '{b3}'  '{b4}'  ( <- '{b}' ) // BEH
                '{t_1}'  '{t_2}' ( <- '{t_}' ) // TEH_MARBUTA
                '{t1}'   '{t2}' '{t3}' '{t4}'  ( <- '{t}' ) // TEH
                '{th1}' '{th2}' '{th3}' '{th4}' ( <- '{th}' ) // THEH
                '{j1}' '{j2}'  '{j3}' '{j4}'(  <- '{j}' ) // JEEM
                '{h1}' '{h2}' '{h3}' '{h4}' ( <- '{h}' ) // HAH
                '{x1}' '{x2}' '{x3}' '{x4}'( <- '{x}' ) // KHAH
                '{d1}'  '{d2}'  ( <- '{d}' ) // DAL
                '{dz1}''{dz2}' ( <- '{dz}' ) // THAL
                '{r1}' '{r2}'( <- '{r}' ) // REH
                '{z1}' '{z2}'  ( <- '{z}' ) // ZAIN
                '{s1}'  '{s2}'   '{s3}' '{s4}'( <- '{s}' ) // SEEN
                '{sh1}' '{sh2}' '{sh3}' '{sh4}' ( <- '{sh}' ) // SHEEN
                '{c1}' '{c2}' '{c3}' '{c4}'( <- '{c}' ) // SAD
                '{dh1}'    '{dh2}'   '{dh3}'  '{dh4}'( <- '{dh}' ) // DAD
                '{tt1}'  '{tt2}'  '{tt3}'  '{tt4}' ( <- '{tt}' ) // TAH
                '{zh1}' '{zh2}' '{zh3}'    '{zh4}'( <- '{zh}' ) // ZAH
                '{i1}' '{i2}' '{i3}'  '{i4}'( <- '{i}' ) // AIN
                '{gh1}' '{gh2}' '{gh3}'  '{gh4}'( <- '{gh}' ) // GHAIN
                '{f1}'  '{f2}' '{f3}'  '{f4}' ( <- '{f}' ) // FEH
                '{q1}' '{q2}' '{q3}' '{q4}' ( <- '{q}' ) // QAF
                '{k1}' '{k2}' '{k3}'  '{k4}'( <- '{k}' ) // KAF
                '{l1}' '{l2}' '{l3}' '{l4}'( <- '{l}' ) // LAM
                '{m1}' '{m2}'  '{m3}' '{m4}'   ( <- '{m}' ) // MEEM
                '{n1}'  '{n2}' '{n3}'  '{n4}'( <- '{n}' ) // NOON
                '{e1}' '{e2}' '{e3}' '{e4}' ( <- '{e}' ) // HEH
                '{w1}'  '{w2}'  ( <- '{w}' ) // WAW
                '{a_1}' '{a_2}' ( <- '{a_}' ) // ALEF_MAKSURA
                '{y1}' '{y2}' '{y3}' '{y4}' ( <- '{y}' ) // YEH

                // Ligatures Lam-Alef
                '{la}'  '{la2}'     (<- '{l}{a}')
                '{lao}'  '{lao2}'   (<- '{l}{ao}')
                '{lao_}'  '{lao_2}' (<- '{l}{ao_}')
                '{la~}'  '{la~2}'    (<- '{l}{a~}')

            )
        )
        or
        next
    )
)

define Normalize_post as (

    do (
        // normalize last hamza
        backwards (
        [substring] among (
            '{ao}''{ao_}' '{a~}' ( <- '{o}')
            '{wo}' ( <- '{o}')
            '{yo}' ( <- '{o}')
        )
        )
    )

    do repeat (
        (
        // normalize other hamza's
            [substring] among (
                '{ao}''{ao_}' '{a~}' ( <- '{a}')
                '{wo}' ( <- '{w}')
                '{yo}' ( <- '{y}')
            )
        )
        or
        next
    )
)
